Utah statutes.
58-64-301.   Licensure required -- License classifications.
(1)  A license is required to engage in the practice of deception detection,
except as specifically provided in Section 58-64-304 or 58-1-307.
(2)  The division shall issue to an individual who qualifies under this
chapter a license in the classifications of:
(a)  deception detection examiner; or
(b)  deception detection intern.
